Utah statutes.
62A-4a-411.   Failure to report -- Criminal penalty.
Any person, official, or institution required to report a case of suspected
abuse, neglect, fetal alcohol syndrome, or fetal drug dependency, who
willfully fails to do so is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.  Action for
failure to report must be commenced within four years from the date of
knowledge of the offense and the willful failure to report.
